Illinois, session 104th, SB1549.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Limited Liability Company Act is amended by 5changing Section 50-10 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 180/50-10)7    Sec. 50-10. Fees. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect in 9accordance with the provisions of this Act and rules 10promulgated under its authority all of the following:11        (1) Fees for filing documents.12        (2) Miscellaneous charges.13        (3) Fees for copies of any documents.14    (b) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for 15all of the following:16        (1) Filing articles of organization (domestic), 17    application for admission (foreign), and restated articles 18    of organization (domestic), $75 $150. Notwithstanding the 19    foregoing, the fee for filing articles of organization 20    (domestic), application for admission (foreign), and 21    restated articles of organization (domestic) in connection 22    with a limited liability company with a series or the 23    ability to establish a series pursuant to Section 37-40 of   SB1549- 2 -LRB104 03787 SPS 13811 b1    this Act is $200 $400. 2        (2) Filing amendments (domestic or foreign), $25 $50.3        (3) Filing a statement of termination or application 4    for withdrawal, $5.5        (4) Filing an application to reserve a name, $25.6        (5) Filing a notice of cancellation of a reserved 7    name, $5.8        (6) Filing a notice of a transfer of a reserved name, 9    $25.10        (7) Registration of a name, $25 $50.11        (8) Renewal of registration of a name, $25 $50.12        (9) Filing an application for use of an assumed name 13    under Section 1-20 of this Act, $75 $150 for each year or 14    part thereof ending in 0 or 5, $60 $120 for each year or 15    part thereof ending in 1 or 6, $45 $90 for each year or 16    part thereof ending in 2 or 7, $30 $60 for each year or 17    part thereof ending in 3 or 8, $15 $30 for each year or 18    part thereof ending in 4 or 9, and a renewal for each 19    assumed name, $75 $150.20        (9.5) Filing an application for change of an assumed 21    name, $12 $25. 22        (10) Filing an application for cancellation of an 23    assumed name, $5.24        (11) Filing an annual report of a limited liability 25    company or foreign limited liability company, $37 $75, if 26    filed as required by this Act, plus a penalty if   SB1549- 3 -LRB104 03787 SPS 13811 b1    delinquent. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the fee for 2    filing an annual report of a limited liability company or 3    foreign limited liability company is $37 $75 plus $25 $50 4    for each series for which a certificate of designation has 5    been filed pursuant to Section 37-40 of this Act and is in 6    effect on the last day of the third month preceding the 7    company's anniversary month, plus a penalty if delinquent. 8        (12) Filing an application for reinstatement of a 9    limited liability company or foreign limited liability 10    company, $100 $200.11        (13) Filing articles of merger, $50 $100 plus $25 $50 12    for each party to the merger in excess of the first 2 13    parties.14        (14) (Blank).15        (15) Filing a statement of change of address of 16    registered office or change of registered agent, or both, 17    or filing a statement of correction, $12 $25.18        (16) Filing a petition for refund, $5.19        (17) Filing a certificate of designation of a limited 20    liability company with a series pursuant to Section 37-40 21    of this Act, $25 $50.22        (18) (Blank).23        (19) Filing, amending, or cancelling a statement of 24    authority, $25 $50.25        (20) Filing, amending, or cancelling a statement of 26    denial, $5 $10.   SB1549- 4 -LRB104 03787 SPS 13811 b1        (21) Filing any other document, $5.2        (22) For furnishing a copy or certified copy of any 3    document, instrument, or paper relating to a limited 4    liability company or foreign limited liability company, or 5    for a certificate, $12 $25. 6    (c) (Blank).7(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-578, eff. 8-26-19; 8102-49, eff. 1-1-22.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.